src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL1_4_OBL_CASES
+Car:тӧгным K ; !
+Com:кӧдным K ; !
+Dat:лыным K ;
+Ela:сьыным K ;
+Ela:сьынымлысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ela:сьынымысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ins:наным K ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тегнум K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кеднум K ; !
+Dat+Err/Dial:лынум K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынум K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынумлысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынумысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ins+Err/Dial:нанум K ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL2_4_OBL_CASES
+Car+So/CP:тӧгныд K ; !
+Car+So/PC:ныдтӧг K ; !
+Car+So/CP+Err/Dial:тэгныд K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныдтэг K ; !
+Cns:ныдла K ;
+Com+So/CP:кӧдныд K ; !
+Com+So/PC:ныдкӧд K ; !
+Com+So/CP+Err/Dial:кедныд K ; !
+Com+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныдкед K ; !
+Dat:лыныд K ;
+Dat:лыныдлы K ;
+Ela:сьыныд K ;
+Ins:наныд K ;
LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL3_4_OBL_CASES
+Car+So/PC:тӧгныс K ; !
+Car+So/PC:ныстӧг K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:тэгныс K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныстэг K ; !
+Cns:нысла K ;
+Com+So/CP:кӧдныс K ; !
+Com+So/PC:ныскӧд K ; !
+Com+So/CP+Err/Dial:кедныс K ; !
+Com+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныскед K ; !
+Dat:лыныс K ;
+Dat:лыныслы K ;
+Dat:ныслы K ;
+Ela:сьыныс K ;
+Ins:наныс K ;
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3


LEXICON PRON_REFL_OBL_CASES
+Ine+PxPl1:аным K ;
+Ine+PxPl1+Err/Dial:анум K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:аныд K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:аныс K ;
+Sg1+Ill:ӧ K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ill+PxSg1:ам K ; !Ӧнія коми кыв gives this for illative only
+Ill+PxSg2:ад K ; !
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1:аным K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1+Err/Dial:анум K ; !
+Ill+PxPl2:аныд K ; !
+Ill+PxPl3:аныс K ; !
+Apr+PxSg1:лань K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным K ;
+Apr+PxPl1+Err/Dial:ланьнум K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ланьныд K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ланьныс K ;
+Egr+PxSg1:сянь K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+Err/Dial:сяньнум K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:сяньныс K ;
+Tra+PxSg1:ті K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Tra+PxSg2:тіыд K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
! Pl1 and Pl2 are not attested in Ӧнія коми кыв
+Tra+PxPl3:тіныс K ;
+Ter+PxSg1:%>ӧдз K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ter+PxSg2:%>ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>ӧдзыс K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>эдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>эдзыс K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:нымӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумедз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:ныдӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:нысӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2+Err/Dial:ныдэдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3+Err/Dial:нысэдз K ;
!Extras 2011-10-07


LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG1_4_NOM
 ACC_WORD_END ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 INE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_POSS
!+Sg: PRON_POSS_CASES ;
!+Pl:%>ъяс PRON_POSS_CASES ;

!LEXICON PRON_POSS_CASES
! ABL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! ACC_WORD_END ;
! CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! EGR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! ILL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! INE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! INS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! PRL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! PRONDEMTAG_APR ;
!PRONDEMTAG_APR_EGR ;
!CNS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! DAT/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
!+AprIll:%>ланьӧ IllCompar ; !
!+AprIll+Err/Dial:%>лане IllCompar ; !

!+Nom+PxSg2:%>ыд K ;
!+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс K ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG1_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! This is bare
! COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! EGR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG2_4_CAR/ELA/NOM
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG2_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ;
! EGR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG2_4_ACC
+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG3_4_NOM
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG3_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
! GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! ILL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_SG3_4_ACC
+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL1_4_NOM
+Acc:%>ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс WordEnd ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL1_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ;  !! bare
! ABL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
!+Der+Der/lador:%>ладор Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL2_4_NOM
 ACC_PXSG2/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL2_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
!+Der+Der/lador:%>ладор Noun1 ;


LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL2_4_ACC
 ACC_PXPL2/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL3_4_NOM
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL3_4_GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
! GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
! PRL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
!

LEXICON PRON_REFL_PL3_4_ACC
ACC_PXPL3/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAG
+Dem: WordEnd ; ! sg/pl?

LEXICON ADNDEMTAG
+Dem: K ;
+Dem: COP_PL ;
+Dem: Noun1 ;
!+Adn+Dem: K ;
!+Adn+Dem: COP_PL ;
!+Adn+Dem+Der/MWN: Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_ES
+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>ійӧ K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>ійӧс K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>ійӧн K ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+Err/Dial:%>іе K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc+Err/Dial:%>іес K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins+Err/Dial:%>іен K ;
+Dem+Sg:%>ы PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>іеяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧян WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>іеян WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійян WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG_TA
+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>йӧ K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>йӧс K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>йӧн K ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+Err/Dial:%>е K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc+Err/Dial:%>ес K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins+Err/Dial:%>ен K ;
+Dem+Sg: PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йӧяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>еяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йӧян PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>еян PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йян PRONDEMTAGPL ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG 
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !distinct from Nom
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Com+Err/Dial:кед K ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тэг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !This is questioned in the 2000 Grammar
+Abl:лысь K ; !
 PRONDEMTAG_APR ;
 PRONDEMTAG_EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG_PRL ;
 PRONDEMTAG_TRA ;
 PRONDEMTAG_TER ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAGPL
!+Pron+Dem+Pl: WordEnd ;
 GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;

+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс WordEnd ;
 ABL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 APR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 EGR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 INE/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_K ;

 PRONDEMTAG_APR_EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG_APR_ELA ;
 PRONDEMTAG_APR_ILL ;
 PRONDEMTAG_APR_INE ;
 PRL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TRA/MORPH_THEN_K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_ELA
+Ela:ысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_APR
+Apr:лань K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_APR_EGR
+AprEgr:ланьсянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_APR_ELA
+AprEla:ланьысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_APR_ILL
+AprIll:ланьӧ K ;
+AprIll+Err/Dial:лане K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_APR_INE
+AprIne:ланьын K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_EGR
+Egr:сянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_PRL
+Prl:ӧд K ;
+Prl+Err/Dial:%>эд K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_TRA
+Tra:ті K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG_TER
+Ter:ӧдз K ;
+Ter+Err/Dial:%>эдз K ;

! Word forms that already have their morphology 
LEXICON PRON_DEM_IS_INE
+Dem+Ine: K ;
