src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
мӧд+Pron:мӧд PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧм+A:сэтшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧм-татшӧм+A:сэтшӧм-татшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧма+Adv:сэтшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтысь+Adv:сэтысь PRONDEMTAG_ELA  "" ;
сэтысянь+Adv:сэтысянь PRONDEMTAG_EGR  "" ;
сэтӧні+Adv:сэтӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сійӧ+Pron:сы PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
тайӧ+Pron:та PRONDEMTAGSG_TA  "tuo" ;
татӧні+Adv:татӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
таян+Pron:таян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
эстшӧм+Pron:эстшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстшӧма+Pron:эстшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстысь+Adv:эстысь PRONDEMTAG_ELA  "" ;
эстысянь+Adv:эстысянь PRONDEMTAG_EGR  "" ;
эсы+Adv:эсы PRONDEMTAG  "tuo" ;
эсыладор+Adv:эсыладор PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсылань+Adv:эсылань PRONDEMTAG_APR  "" ;
эсыметь+Pron:эсыметь PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсымында+Adv:эсымында PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсійӧ+Pron:эс PRONDEMTAG_ES  "tuo" ;
эсіян+Pron:эсіян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
этайӧ+Pron:эта PRONDEMTAGSG_TA  "juuri tämä" ;
эталань+Pron:эталань PRONDEMTAG_APR  "" ;
эталаньсянь+Pron:эталаньсянь PRONDEMTAG_APR_EGR  "" ;
эталаньысь+Pron:эталаньысь PRONDEMTAG_APR_ELA  "" ;
эталаньӧ+Pron:эталаньӧ PRONDEMTAG_APR_ILL  "" ;
этан+Adv:этан PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этані+Adv:этані PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧм+Pron:этатшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧма+Pron:этатшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатысь+Adv:этатысь PRONDEMTAG_ELA  "" ;
этатысянь+Adv:этатысянь PRONDEMTAG_EGR  "" ;
этійӧ+Pron:этійӧ PRONDEMTAG  "juuri tämä" ;
